Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
ADMINISTRATION, POWERS AND DUTIES

[§161-6] Division of animal industry.
The division of animal industry of the department of agriculture shall
administer this chapter subject to the supervision of the board. The board may
delegate any of its powers under this chapter, except the power to make rules
and regulations, or may direct any of its duties to be performed by any
appropriate agents, officers, or employees of the board.

The board may employ on a full or part-time
basis veterinarians and poultry inspectors, subject to chapter 76, to carry out
a uniform inspection system of poultry or poultry products throughout the
State. All poultry inspectors shall be under the supervision and control of a
veterinarian employed by the board. [L 1969, c 212, §4; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next